New York, session 2025-2026, S7362.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The highway law is amended by adding a new section 344-r to 2 read as follows: 3 § 344-r. Portion of the state highway system to be dedicated to John 4 F. McArdle. All that portion of the state highway system constituting 5 state route three hundred one from its intersection with Belden Road to 6 its intersection with Gipsy Trail Road in the town of Carmel, county of 7 Putnam, shall be dedicated to John F. McArdle. 8 § 2. The commissioner of transportation shall provide for the instal- 9 lation and maintenance of adequate signing of the state highway system 10 as dedicated pursuant to section one of this act, provided that such 11 signing shall state "Highway Dedicated to John F McArdle". However, to 12 avoid confusion and to limit any possible disruption of commerce, the 13 dedication called for pursuant to section one of this act shall be one 14 of ceremonial nature and the official name of such highway shall not be 15 changed as a result of this act. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10853-07-5